Washington statutes.
RCW 19.230.360

Third-party account administrators—Record maintenance.

(1) A third-party account administrator shall maintain the following records for at least five years:

(a) All contracts the third-party account administrator has entered into with debtors and debt adjusters;

(b) Account statements identifying and itemizing deposits, transfers, disbursements, and fees; and

(c) Any other records required in rule by the director.

(2) All records maintained by the third-party account administrator are open to inspection by the director or the director's designee.

[ 2012 c 56 s 4.]

NOTES:

Information—Report—2012 c 56: See note following RCW 19.230.350.